Utah statutes.
16-7-12.   Dissolution of corporation sole.

(1)  A corporation sole may be dissolved and its affairs wound up voluntarily by filing with the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code articles of dissolution, fully executed and signed under penalty of perjury, by the chief officer of the corporation.  If any corporation sole ceases to have assets, has failed to function, or desires to terminate its existence, the articles of dissolution may be filed by any officer of the corporation authorized to administer the affairs and property of the corporation.

(2)  An original and a copy of the articles of dissolution shall be submitted to the Division of Corporations and Commercial Code.  If it conforms to law, the division shall file it and issue a certificate of dissolution.  After the issuance of this certificate, the corporation shall cease to carry on business, except for the purpose of adjusting and winding up its affairs.

(3)  The articles of dissolution shall set forth:

(a)  the name of the corporation;

(b)  the reason for its dissolution or winding up;

(c)  that dissolution of the corporation has been duly authorized by the organization governed by the corporation sole;

(d)  the names and addresses of the persons who are to supervise the winding up of the affairs of the corporation;

(e)  that all debts, obligations, and liabilities of the corporation sole have been paid and discharged or that adequate provision has been made therefor;

(f)  that all the remaining property and assets of the corporation sole have been transferred, conveyed, or distributed in accordance with the purposes of Section 16-7-1; and

(g)  that there are no suits pending against the corporation sole in any court, or that adequate provision has been made for the satisfaction of any judgment, order, or decree which may be entered against it in any pending suit.

(4)  The Division of Corporations and Commercial Code may administratively dissolve a corporation sole that does not comply with Subsection 16-7-15(1) in accordance with the relevant procedures for administrative dissolution of a nonprofit corporation under Sections 16-6a-1411, 16-6a-1412, and 16-6a-1413.

